ru: Тип балансировки нажимного диска: Внешняя; Внутренняя; Нейтральная / не указана; Другое
da: Type trykpladebalance: Eksternt afbalanceret; Internt afbalanceret; Neutral/uspecificeret; Anden
zh-CN: 压盘平衡类型: 外部平衡; 内部平衡; 中性/未指定; 其他
es: Tipo de balanceo del plato de presión: Balanceado externamente; Balanceado internamente; Neutro/no especificado; Otro
sk-SK: Druh vyváženia prítlačnej dosky: Externe vyvážený; Interne vyvážený; Neutrálny/nešpecifikovaný; Iný
pt-PT: Tipo de equilíbrio da placa de pressão: Equilibrado externamente; Equilibrado internamente; Neutro/não especificado; Outro
nb: Trykkplate – balansetype: Utvendig avbalansert; Innvendig avbalansert; Nøytral / uspesifisert; Annet
nl: Drukgroep balanstype: Extern gebalanceerd; Intern gebalanceerd; Neutraal/ongespecificeerd; Anders
hr-HR: Pritisna ploča saldo tipa: Vanjski uravnoteženo; Unutarnje uravnoteženo; Neutralno/neodređeno; Ostalo
fr: Type d’équilibrage du plateau de pression: À équilibrage externe; À équilibrage interne; Neutre/non spécifié; Autre
cs: Typ vyvážení přítlačné desky: Externě vyvážené; Interně vyvážené; Neutrální/nespecifikováno; Ostatní
ja: 圧力プレートバランスタイプ: 外部バランス; 内部バランス; ニュートラル/未指定; その他
ko: 압력판 밸런스 유형: 외부 밸런스형; 내부 밸런스형; 중립/미지정; 기타
zh-TW: 壓板平衡類型: 外部平衡; 內部平衡; 中性/未指定; 其他
it: Tipo di bilanciamento della piastra di pressione: A bilanciatura esterna; A bilanciatura interna; Neutro/non specificato; Altro
fi: Painelevyn tasapainotyyppi: Ulkoisesti tasapainotettu; Sisäisesti tasapainotettu; Neutraali / ei määritetty; Muu
en: Pressure plate balance type: Externally balanced; Internally balanced; Neutral/unspecified; Other
de: Auswuchtungsart der Druckplatte: Außengewuchtet; Innengewuchtet; Neutral/Unspezifiziert; Sonstige
sv: Balanstyp för tryckplatta: Externt balanserad; Internt balanserad; Neutral/ospecificerad; Övrigt
tr: Baskı plakası dengeleme tipi: Dıştan dengeli; İçten dengeli; Nötr/belirtilmemiş; Diğer
ro-RO: Tipul de echilibrare al plăcii de presiune: Echilibrat extern; Echilibrat intern; Neutru/nespecificat; Altele
el: Τύπος εξισορρόπησης της πλάκας πίεσης: Εξωτερικά ζυγοσταθμισμένο; Εσωτερικά ζυγοσταθμισμένο; Ουδέτερο/μη καθορισμένο; Άλλο
lt-LT: Prispaudimo disko balansavimo tipas: Subalansuota iš išorės; Subalansuota iš vidaus; Neutrali / nenurodyta; Kita
bg-BG: Тип баланс на притискателния диск: Външно балансиран; Вътрешно балансиран; Неутрален/неуточнен; Друго
pl: Typ wyważenia docisku sprzęgła: Wyważenie zewnętrzne; Wyważenie wewnętrzne; Neutralne/nieokreślone; Inne
sl-SI: Vrsta uravnoteženja potisne plošče: Zunanje uravnoteženo; Notranje uravnoteženo; Nevtralno/neopredeljeno; Drugo
th: แผ่นดันเหลือแบบคงเหลือ: ปรับสมดุลภายนอก; ปรับสมดุลภายใน; สมดุล/ไม่ระบุ; อื่นๆ
pt-BR: Platô tipo de balanceamento: Balanceamento externo; Balanceamento interno; Neutro/não especificado; Outro
vi: Loại cân bằng tấm áp lực: Cân bằng ngoài; Cân bằng trong; Trung tính/không xác định; Khác
hu: Nyomólap kiegyensúlyozási típusa: Külső kiegyensúlyozású; Belső kiegyensúlyozású; Semleges / nem meghatározott; Egyéb